New York, session 2025-2026, A2085.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 5 of the legislative law, as added 2 by chapter 635 of the laws of 1998, is amended to read as follows: 3 3. "Legislative passage of the budget", solely for the purposes of 4 this section and [section] sections five-a and fifty-three-a of this 5 [article] chapter, shall mean that the appropriation bill or bills 6 submitted by the governor pursuant to section three of article seven of 7 the state constitution have been finally acted on by both houses of the 8 legislature in accordance with article seven of the state constitution 9 and the state comptroller has determined that such appropriation bill or 10 bills that have been finally acted on by the legislature are sufficient 11 for the ongoing operation and support of state government and local 12 assistance for the ensuing fiscal year. In addition, legislation submit- 13 ted by the governor pursuant to section three of article seven of the 14 state constitution determined necessary by the legislature for the 15 effective implementation of such appropriation bill or bills shall have 16 been acted on. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the 17 prohibition contained in section five of article seven of the state 18 constitution. 19 § 2. The legislative law is amended by adding a new section 53-a to 20 read as follows: 21 § 53-a. Failure to enact a timely budget; prohibit recess. If upon the 22 commencement of the fiscal year, as defined in section three of the 23 state finance law, legislative passage of the budget, as defined in EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05692-01-5 A. 2085 2 1 subdivision three of section five of this chapter, has not occurred, the 2 legislature shall not recess until such passage occurs, except that the 3 legislature may recess during such period for public holidays. 4 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.